Washington statutes.
RCW 18.19.060

Information disclosure to clients.

Certified counselors and certified advisers shall provide clients at the commencement of any program of treatment with accurate disclosure information concerning their practice, in accordance with guidelines developed by the department, that will inform clients of the purposes of and resources available under this chapter, including the right of clients to refuse treatment, the responsibility of clients for choosing the provider and treatment modality which best suits their needs, and the extent of confidentiality provided by this chapter, the department, another agency, or other jurisdiction. The disclosure statement must inform the client of the certified counselor's or certified adviser's consultation arrangement or supervisory agreement as defined in rules adopted by the secretary. The disclosure information provided by the certified counselor or certified adviser, the receipt of which shall be acknowledged in writing by the certified counselor or certified adviser and the client, shall include any relevant education and training, the therapeutic orientation of the practice, the proposed course of treatment where known, any financial requirements, referral resources, and such other information as the department may require by rule. The disclosure information shall also include a statement that the certification of an individual under this chapter does not include a recognition of any practice standards, nor necessarily imply the effectiveness of any treatment. Certified counselors and certified advisers must also disclose that they are not credentialed to diagnose mental disorders or to conduct psychotherapy as defined by the secretary by rule. The client is not liable for any fees or charges for services rendered prior to receipt of the disclosure statement.

[ 2008 c 135 s 7; 2001 c 251 s 22; 1987 c 512 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 135 ss 1, 2, 7-9, and 11-19: See note following RCW 18.19.020.

Severability—2001 c 251: See RCW 18.225.900.